New York, session 2025-2026, S6501.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 1 and 1-a of part FFF of chapter 56 of the laws of 2 2020 relating to directing the department of health to remove the phar- 3 macy benefit from the managed care benefit package and to provide the 4 pharmacy benefit under the fee for service program, are REPEALED. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10941-01-5